Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 13 Malt Beverage Supplier-Wholesaler Agreements

3-13-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agreement” means any contract, agreement, or arrangement, whether expressed or implied, whether oral or written, for a definite or indefinite period between a supplier and a wholesaler pursuant to which a wholesaler has the right to purchase, resell, and distribute any or all brands of malt beverages offered by the supplier. The agreement between a supplier and a wholesaler is not considered a franchise relationship.

“Good cause” means the failure by any party to an agreement, without reasonable excuse and justification, to comply substantially with a reasonable requirement imposed by either party.

“Malt beverage” means the same as defined in chapter 1 of this title.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, trust, agency, corporation, division of a corporation, or other form of business enterprise. Person also includes heirs, assigns, personal representatives, and guardians.

“Supplier” means any person engaged in business as a brewer, manufacturer, importer, master wholesaler, broker, or agent of malt beverages who enters into an agreement with any wholesaler in this state to distribute any or all of its brands of malt beverages, and any successor-in-interest to that entity with respect to the agreement. The term supplier does not refer to any brewer licensed under §

3-6-1

.

“Territory” or “sales territory” means the geographic area of primary sales responsibility designated by an agreement between a wholesaler and supplier for any brand or brands of the supplier.

“This act” means this chapter that has the short title and may be cited as the “Beer Industry Fair Dealing Law”.

“Wholesaler” means any person licensed to import, or cause to be imported, into this state, or to purchase, or cause to be purchased, in this state, malt beverages for resale or distribution to retailers licensed in this state, and any successor-in-interest to that entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 45.

3-13-2.
Purposes — Construction — Variation by contract prohibited.

This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its remedial purposes and policies.

The purposes and policies of this chapter are:

To regulate agreements between suppliers and their wholesalers to benefit the economy and enhance competition in this state and to promote moderation and obedience to the laws of this state and the United States controlling the distribution and sale of malt beverages;

To protect wholesalers substantial initial and continuing investments of money, time and effort in their distributorships and to stimulate greater investment of those resources in these small businesses by assuring their continuation on a fair, equitable and nondiscriminatory basis;

To enhance competition in the malt beverage industry by:

Assuring the wholesaler is free to manage its business enterprise in the manner the wholesaler deems best, including the wholesaler’s right independently to establish its selling prices, to determine the efforts and resources which the wholesaler will exert to promote and develop the sale of a supplier’s products; and

Assuring the public and suppliers that wholesalers will price competitively, devote reasonable efforts and resources to sales of all supplier’s products marketed in this state and maintain satisfactory sales levels.

To govern all relations between suppliers and their wholesalers, including any renewals to agreements between them, to the full extent consistent with the constitutions of this state and the United States.

The effect of this chapter may not be varied by agreement. Any agreement purporting to do so is void and unenforceable to that extent only.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-3.
Prior notification of cancellation.

Except as provided in subsection (c), no supplier or wholesaler may cancel, fail to renew, or otherwise terminate an agreement unless the supplier or wholesaler furnishes prior notification in accordance with subsection (b) to the affected party.

The notification required under subsection (a) shall be in writing and sent to the affected party by certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than ninety (90) days before the date on which the agreement will be cancelled, not renewed, or otherwise terminated. The notification shall contain:

A statement of intention to cancel, not renew, or otherwise terminate;

A statement of all reasons, stated with particularity;

The date on which the action shall take effect; and

A statement of the remedy or remedies available to the affected party to cure the specified cause.

A supplier or wholesaler may cancel, fail to renew or otherwise terminate an agreement without furnishing the prior notification required under this section only:

In the event of insolvency, liquidation or bankruptcy of the affected party;

In the event the affected party makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors or similar disposition of substantially all of the assets of that party’s business; or

In the event of a conviction or plea of guilty or no contest to a charge of violating a law or regulation, or the revocation of a license or permit, relating to business which materially and adversely affects the party’s ability to continue in business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-4.
Cancellation of agreements — Good cause required.

No supplier or wholesaler may cancel, fail to renew, or otherwise terminate an agreement unless the party intending that action has good cause for that action and, in any case in which prior notification is required under §

3-13-3

, the party intending to act has furnished prior notification and the affected party has not corrected the conduct specified in that notification as the reason for cancellation, failure to renew, or termination, within the period specified in that notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-5.
Prohibited conduct.

No supplier shall:

Induce or coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any wholesaler to accept delivery of any malt beverage or any other item or commodity which has not been ordered by the wholesaler. Provided, that recommendation, endorsement, exposition, persuasion, or argument is not deemed to constitute inducements, coercion, or requirements prohibited by this section.

Induce or coerce, or attempt to induce or coerce, any wholesaler to engage in any illegal act or course of conduct or to resign from an agreement by means of any threat, expressed or implied, to cancel, fail to renew, otherwise terminate an agreement, any requirement imposed on the wholesaler pursuant to an agreement or any contract or other arrangement ancillary or collateral to these.

Require a wholesaler to assent to any requirement, condition, understanding, or term of an agreement limiting the wholesaler’s right to sell the product of any other supplier.

Fix or maintain the price at which a wholesaler may resell malt beverages, whether by the terms or requirements imposed on the wholesaler under an agreement, the manner of their enforcement, or otherwise.

Impose, attempt to impose, or enforce against a wholesaler any requirement, standard of performance, or term, including the terms of sale of malt beverages sold to the wholesaler, which is discriminatory as compared with the requirements, standards, or terms imposed by the supplier on other similarly situated wholesalers within this state. Differences in any requirement, standard, or term imposed by a supplier under its agreement or in the manner of their enforcement are permitted only if and to the extent they are based on proper and justifiable distinctions considering the purposes of this chapter, and are not arbitrary.

Fail to provide to each wholesaler of its brands after May 22, 1982 a written contract which conforms to this chapter and embodies the supplier’s agreement with its wholesalers, including the essential requirements, standards of performance, and terms imposed by the supplier. In the event of failure to provide that written contract, any agreement in existence upon May 22, 1982 must conform to this chapter and is subject to this chapter until the written contract is provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-6.
Transfer of business assets of stock.

No supplier shall, by the terms of an agreement or otherwise, unreasonably withhold or delay approval of any assignment, sale, or transfer of the stock of a wholesaler or all or any portion of a wholesaler’s assets, wholesaler’s voting stock, the voting stock of any parent corporation, or the beneficial ownership or control of any other entity owning or controlling a wholesaler, including the wholesaler’s rights and obligations under the terms of an agreement whenever the person or persons to be substituted meet reasonable and express standards imposed not only upon the wholesaler but upon all other wholesalers of a supplier generally.

Upon the death of one of the partners of a partnership operating the business of a wholesaler, no supplier shall deny the surviving partner or partners of that partnership the right to become a successor-in-interest to the agreement between the supplier and that partnership; provided the survivor has been active in the management of the partnership and is otherwise capable of carrying on the business of the partnership.

A wholesaler shall not transfer or agree to transfer any of its rights and obligations under the terms of any agreement without first giving prior notice to the supplier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-7.
Damages for improper cancellation, termination, or failure to renew — Arbitration.

Any supplier which without good cause cancels, terminates or fails to renew any agreement, or unlawfully causes a wholesaler to resign from an agreement or unreasonably denies or withholds consent to any assignment, transfer or sale of business assets or capital stock or other equity securities of a wholesaler with whom that supplier has an agreement pursuant to §

3-13-5(6)

, is subject to compensatory damages, equitable relief, or both. Compensatory damages include reasonable compensation for the value of the wholesaler’s business with relation to the affected brand or brands and the wholesaler’s goodwill, if any.

The supplier and the wholesaler may, by the terms of an agreement or otherwise, submit the disputes set forth in subsection (a), including the compensation, if any, to be paid for the value of the wholesaler’s business, to a neutral arbitrator to be selected by the parties, or if they cannot agree, by the presiding justice of the Rhode Island superior court. The arbitration proceeding shall be held within the state and shall be governed by chapter 3 of title 10. Arbitration costs shall be paid one-half (1/2) by the wholesaler and one-half (1/2) by the supplier. The award of the arbitrator is final and binding on the parties.

Unless otherwise ordered by the superior court, all of the terms and conditions of an agreement between the parties shall remain in full force and effect for a period not to exceed one year during the course of any arbitration or judicial proceedings brought to enforce any rights under an agreement or under this chapter. No supplier who, pursuant to an agreement with a wholesaler, has designated a sales territory for which the wholesaler is primarily responsible or in which the wholesaler is required to concentrate its efforts, shall enter into an agreement with any other wholesaler during that one year period for the purpose of establishing an additional wholesaler for any of its brands or products. Notwithstanding any pending arbitration proceeding, a party may petition the superior court in accordance with §

3-13-11

to obtain any relief as may be necessary to enforce this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-8.
Sale of supplier.

Except for discontinuance of all sales of a brand or brands in this state or for good cause, any person who purchases a supplier becomes obligated to all of the terms of any agreement in effect on the date of purchase. The acquiring supplier is not obligated to supply its brand or brands to the wholesalers of the acquired supplier. Nothing prevents the parties from negotiating a new agreement consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The term purchase includes, but is not limited to, a purchase of stock, purchase of assets, lease, merger, or any other reorganization, consolidation, or acquisition of a supplier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-9.
Sales territories exclusive.

No supplier who, pursuant to an agreement with a wholesaler, has designated a sales territory for which a wholesaler is primarily responsible or in which a wholesaler is required to concentrate its efforts shall enter into an agreement with any other wholesaler for the purpose of establishing an additional wholesaler for any of its brands, including any brand or brands introduced after the effective date of the agreement, in all or part of the same territory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-10.
Right of free association.

No supplier or wholesaler shall restrict or inhibit, directly or indirectly, the right of free association among suppliers or wholesalers for any lawful purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-11.
Civil actions.

If a supplier or wholesaler who is a party to an agreement pursuant to §

3-13-5(6)

fails to comply with this chapter or otherwise engages in conduct prohibited under this chapter, the affected party may maintain a civil action in the superior court in the county in which the wholesaler’s principal place of business or residence is located.

In any action under this section, the court may grant any equitable relief that the court determines is necessary or appropriate considering the purposes of this chapter, to remedy the effects of any failure to comply with this chapter or the effect of conduct prohibited under this chapter.

The prevailing party in any action under this section is entitled to actual damages as defined in §

3-13-7

, plus interest and costs.

To the extent the parties by agreement specify that disputes arising out of the supplier-wholesaler relationship shall be resolved by arbitration, that procedure shall be the exclusive remedy and may be compelled by either party upon proper application under the law of this state. An affected party may maintain a civil action in the superior court to enforce the provisions of §

3-13-7(c)

, notwithstanding any pending arbitration proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.

3-13-12.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter is held unconstitutional, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 415, § 1.